Utah statutes.
64-13-15.   Property of offender -- Storage and disposal.

(1) (a)  Offenders may retain personal property at correctional facilities only as authorized by the department.  An offender's property which is retained by the department shall be inventoried and placed in storage by the department and a receipt for the property shall be issued to the offender. Offenders shall be required to arrange for disposal of property retained by the department within a reasonable time under department rules.  Property retained by the department shall be returned to the offender at discharge, or in accordance with Title 75, Utah Uniform Probate Code, in the case of death prior to discharge.

(b)  If property is not claimed within one year of  discharge, or it is not disposed of by the offender within a reasonable time after the department's order to arrange for disposal, it becomes property of the state and may be used for correctional purposes or donated to a charity within the state.

(c)  If an inmate's property is not claimed within one year of his death, it becomes the property of the state in accordance with Section 75-2-105.

(d)  Funds which are contraband and in the physical custody of any prisoner, whether in the form of currency and coin which are legal tender in any jurisdiction or negotiable instruments drawn upon a personal or business account, shall be subject to forfeiture following a hearing which accords with prevailing standards of due process.  All such forfeited funds shall be used by the department for purposes which promote the general welfare of prisoners in the custody of the department.  Money and negotiable instruments taken from offenders' mail under department rule and which are not otherwise contraband shall be placed in an account administered by the department, to the credit of the offender who owns the money or negotiable instruments.

(2)  Upon discharge from a secure correctional facility, the department may give an inmate transition funds in an amount established by the department with the approval of the director of the Division of Finance. At its discretion, the department may spend the funds directly on the purchase of necessities or transportation for the discharged inmate.

